Virginia statutes. Title 13.1. Corporations.
Article 8. Shareholders.

Michie’s Jurisprudence.

For related discussion, see

4B M.J. Corporations,
§§ 96, 142, 146-149.

§ 13.1-654.
Annual meeting.

Unless directors are elected by written consent in lieu of an annual meeting as permitted by §

13.1-657

, a corporation shall hold a meeting of shareholders annually at a time stated in or fixed in accordance with the bylaws, except that a corporation registered under the federal Investment Company Act of 1940 is not required to hold an annual meeting in any year in which the election of directors is not required to be held under the federal Investment Company Act of 1940 unless the articles of incorporation or bylaws of the corporation require an annual meeting to be held.

Except as otherwise determined by the board of directors acting pursuant to subsection C of §

13.1-660.2

, annual meetings may be held, in or outside of the Commonwealth at the place stated in or fixed in accordance with the bylaws or, if not inconsistent with the bylaws, in the notice of the meeting.

The failure to hold an annual meeting at the time stated in or fixed in accordance with the corporation’s bylaws does not affect the validity of any corporate action.

History.

Code 1950, § 13.1-25; 1956, c. 428; 1975, c. 500; 1985, c. 522; 1990, c. 228; 2003, c. 728; 2005, c. 765; 2007, c. 165; 2012, c. 706; 2017, c. 646; 2019, c. 734.

Editor’s note.

For the Investment Company Act of 1940, referred to above, see 15 U.S.C.S. § 80a-1 et seq.

The 2003 amendments.

The 2003 amendment by c. 728, in subsection A, deleted “if the articles of incorporation or bylaws of” following “except that,” deleted “so provide, the corporation” following the first occurrence of “1940,” and added “unless the articles of incorporation or bylaws of the corporation require an annual meeting to be held”; added present subsection C; and redesignated former subsection C as present subsection D.

The 2005 amendments.

The 2005 amendment by c. 765, in subsection A, inserted “a meeting of shareholders” following “shall hold” and deleted “a meeting of shareholders” following “with the bylaws.”

The 2007 amendments.

The 2007 amendment by c. 165 added “Unless directors are elected by written consent in lieu of an annual meeting as permitted by §

13.1-657

” at the beginning of subsection A; and substituted “the Commonwealth” for “this Commonwealth” in subsection B.

The 2012 amendments.

The 2012 amendment by c. 706 deleted former subsection C, which read: “If the articles of incorporation or bylaws so provide, shareholders may participate in an annual meeting by use of any means of communication by which all shareholders participating may simultaneously hear each other during the meeting. A shareholder participating in a meeting by this means is deemed to be present in person at the meeting,” and redesignated former subsection D as C.

The 2017 amendments.

The 2017 amendment by c. 646 substituted “Except as otherwise determined by the board of directors acting pursuant to subsection C of §

13.1-660.2

” for “Annual” in subsection B.

The 2019 amendments.

The 2019 amendment by c. 734, in subsection A, inserted “federal” preceding “Investment Company” twice; and rewrote subsection B, which read: “Except as otherwise determined by the board of directors acting pursuant to subsection C of §

13.1-660.2

, shareholders’ meetings may be held at such place, in or out of the Commonwealth, as may be provided in the bylaws or, where not inconsistent the bylaws, in the notice of the meeting”; and made a stylistic change.

Law Review.

For article, “The New Virginia Stock Corporation Act: A Primer,” see 20 U. Rich. L. Rev. 67 (1985).

For survey article, “Corporate and Business Law,” see 48 U. Rich. L. Rev. 39 (2013).

§ 13.1-655.
Special meeting.

A corporation shall hold a special meeting of shareholders:

On call of the chairman of the board of directors, the president, the board of directors, or the person or persons authorized to do so by the articles of incorporation or bylaws; or

In the case of a corporation that is not a public corporation and that has 35 or fewer shareholders of record, if the holders of at least 20 percent of all the votes entitled to be cast on an issue proposed to be considered at the special meeting sign, date, and deliver to the corporation’s secretary one or more written demands for the meeting describing the purpose or purposes for which it is to be held. For such a corporation, the articles of incorporation may provide for an increase or decrease in the percentage stated in this subdivision or may prohibit shareholders from calling a special meeting.

Unless otherwise provided in the articles of incorporation, a written demand for a special meeting may be revoked by a writing, including an electronic transmission, to that effect received by the corporation’s secretary before the start of the special meeting.

If not otherwise fixed under §

13.1-656

or

13.1-660

, the record date for determining shareholders entitled to demand a special meeting shall be the first date on which a signed shareholder demand is delivered to the corporation’s secretary. No written demand for a special meeting shall be effective unless, within 60 days of the earliest date on which such a demand delivered to the corporation’s secretary as required by this section was signed, written demands signed by shareholders that satisfy the requirements of subsection A have been delivered to the corporation’s secretary.

Except as otherwise determined by the board of directors acting pursuant to subsection C of §

13.1-660.2

, special meetings of shareholders may be held in or outside of the Commonwealth at the place stated in or fixed in accordance with the bylaws. If no place is so stated or fixed, special meetings shall be held at the corporation’s principal office.

Only business within the purpose or purposes described in the meeting notice required by subsection C of §

13.1-658

may be conducted at a special meeting of shareholders.

History.

Code 1950, § 13.1-25; 1956, c. 428; 1975, c. 500; 1985, c. 522; 2003, c. 728; 2005, c. 765; 2012, c. 706; 2017, c. 646; 2019, c. 734.

The 2017 amendments.

The 2017 amendment by c. 646 substituted “a corporation that is not a public corporation and that has” for “corporations having” in subdivision A 2; and substituted “Except as otherwise determined by the board of directors acting pursuant to subsection C of §

13.1-660.2

” for “Special” in subsection D.

The 2003 amendments.

The 2003 amendment by c. 728 substituted “35” for “thirty-five” and “20” for “twenty” in subdivision A 2; added present subsection E; and redesignated former subection E as present subsection F.

The 2005 amendments.

The 2005 amendment by c. 765 added the last sentence in subdivision A 2; and rewrote subsection B.

The 2012 amendments.

The 2012 amendment by c. 706 deleted former subsection E, which read “If the articles of incorporation or bylaws so provide, shareholders may participate in a special shareholders’ meeting by use of any means of communication by which all shareholders participating may simultaneously hear each other during the meeting. A shareholder participating in a meeting by this means is deemed to be present in person at the meeting,” and redesignated former subsection F as E.

The 2019 amendments.

The 2019 amendment by c. 734, in subdivision A 2, in the last sentence, inserted “For such a corporation” at the beginning, and added “or may prohibit shareholders from calling a special meeting” at the end; in subsection B, substituted “corporation’s secretary before the start of the” for “corporation prior to the receipt by the corporation of demands sufficient in number to require the holding of a”; rewrote subsections C and D, which read: “If not otherwise fixed under §

13.1-656

or

13.1-660

, the record date for determining shareholders entitled to demand a special meeting is the date the first shareholder signs the demand. D. Except as otherwise determined by the board of directors acting pursuant to subsection C of §

13.1-660

.2, shareholders’ meetings may be held at such place in or out of this Commonwealth as may be provided in the bylaws or, where not inconsistent with the bylaws, in the notice of the meeting”; and made stylistic changes.

§ 13.1-656.
Court-ordered meeting.

The circuit court of the city or county where a corporation’s principal office is located or, if none in the Commonwealth, where its registered office is located, may, after notice to the corporation, order a meeting of shareholders to be held:

On petition of any shareholder of the corporation if an annual meeting was not held or action by written consent in lieu of an annual meeting did not become effective within 15 months after its last annual meeting or, if there has been no annual meeting, the date of its incorporation; or

On petition of one or more shareholders who signed a demand for a special meeting valid under subsection A of §

13.1-655

if:

Notice of the special meeting was not given within 30 days after the first day on which the requisite number of such demands have been delivered to the corporation’s secretary; or

The special meeting was not held in accordance with the notice.

The court may fix the date, time, and place of the meeting, determine the shares entitled to participate in the meeting, specify a record date or dates for determining shareholders entitled to notice of and to vote at the meeting, prescribe the form and content of the meeting notice, fix the quorum required for specific matters to be considered at the meeting, or direct that the shares represented at the meeting constitute a quorum for action on those matters, and enter other orders necessary to accomplish the purpose or purposes of the meeting.

History.

1985, c. 522; 2005, c. 765; 2007, c. 165; 2010, c. 782; 2019, c. 734.

The 2005 amendments.

The 2005 amendment by c. 765 inserted “of shareholders” following “a meeting” in subsection A; substituted “15 months” for “fifteen months” in subdivision A 1; and substituted “30 days” for “thirty days” in subdivision A 2 a.

The 2007 amendments.

The 2007 amendment by c. 165 substituted “the Commonwealth” for “this Commonwealth” in the introductory paragraph of subsection A, and inserted “or action by written consent in lieu thereof did not become effective” in subdivision A 1.

The 2010 amendments.

The 2010 amendment by c. 782 inserted “or dates” following “record date” in subsection B.

The 2019 amendments.

The 2019 amendment by c. 734, in subdivision A 1, deleted “entitled to participate in an annual meeting” following “corporation,” and substituted “of an annual meeting” for “thereof”; rewrote subdivision A 2, which read: “On petition of a shareholder who signed a demand for a special meeting that satisfies the requirements of §

13.1-655

if”; in subdivision A 2 a., substituted “first day on which the requisite number of such demands have been” for “date the demand was”; in subsection B, inserted “date” following “may fix the” and “fix the quorum required for specific matters to be considered at the meeting, or direct that the shares represented at the meeting constitute a quorum for action on those matters”; and made stylistic changes.

§ 13.1-657.
Action without meeting.

Action required or permitted by this chapter to be taken at a shareholders’ meeting may be taken without a meeting if the action is taken by all the shareholders entitled to vote on the action, in which case no action by the board of directors shall be required. The action shall be evidenced by one or more written consents bearing the date of signature and describing the action taken, signed by all the shareholders entitled to vote on the action and delivered to the corporation’s secretary for filing by the corporation with the minutes of the meeting or corporate records.

The articles of incorporation may authorize action by shareholders by less than unanimous written consent, provided that the taking of such action is consistent with any requirements that may be set forth in the articles of incorporation, the bylaws, or this section; however, unless the articles of incorporation of a public corporation authorized action by shareholders by less than unanimous written consent as of April 1, 2018, the shareholders of the public corporation shall not be entitled to act by less than unanimous written consent even if so authorized by the articles of incorporation if the articles of incorporation or bylaws of such public corporation allow the holders of 30 percent or fewer of all votes entitled to be cast to demand the calling of a special meeting of shareholders. For action by shareholders by less than unanimous written consent to be valid:

It shall be an action that this chapter requires or permits to be taken at a shareholders’ meeting;

The articles of incorporation shall authorize action by shareholders by less than unanimous written consent and, if a public corporation at the time of such authorization in addition to the other limitations in this subsection B, the inclusion of the authorization in the articles of incorporation was approved by each voting group entitled to vote by the greater of:

The vote of that voting group required by the articles of incorporation to amend the articles of incorporation; or

More than two-thirds of all votes that the voting group is entitled to cast on the amendment;

At least 10 days before the holders of more than 10 percent of the outstanding shares of any voting group entitled to vote on the action to be taken have signed the written consent, the corporation’s secretary shall have received a copy of the form of written consent setting forth the action to be taken;

If required by this chapter, the articles of incorporation, or the bylaws, the board of directors shall have approved this action; and

The holders of not less than the minimum number of outstanding shares of each voting group entitled to vote on the action that would be required to take the action at a shareholders’ meeting at which all shares of each voting group entitled to vote on the action were present and voted shall have signed written consents setting forth the action to be taken.

A written consent shall bear the date on which each shareholder signed the consent and be delivered to the corporation’s secretary for inclusion in the minutes or filing with the corporate records.

If not otherwise fixed under §

13.1-656

or

13.1-660

and if prior action by the board of directors is not required respecting the action to be taken without a meeting, the record date for determining the shareholders entitled to take action without a meeting shall be the first date on which a signed written consent is delivered to the corporation’s secretary. If not otherwise fixed under §

13.1-656

or

13.1-660

and if prior action by the board of directors is required respecting the action to be taken without a meeting, the record date shall be the close of business on the day the action of the board is taken. No written consent shall be effective to take the action referred to in such consent unless, within 60 days of the earliest date on which a consent delivered to the corporation’s secretary as required by this section was signed, written consents signed by the holders of shares having sufficient votes to take the corporate action have been delivered to the corporation’s secretary. A written consent may be revoked by a writing to that effect delivered to the corporation’s secretary before unrevoked written consents sufficient in number to take the corporate action are delivered to the corporation.

A consent signed pursuant to the provisions of this section has the effect of a vote taken at a meeting and may be described as such in any document. Unless the articles of incorporation, bylaws, or a resolution of the board of directors provides for a reasonable delay to permit tabulation of written consents, the action taken by written consent shall be effective when (i) written consents signed by the holders of shares having sufficient votes to adopt or take the action are delivered to the corporation’s secretary or (ii) if an effective date is specified therein, as of such date provided such consent states the date of execution by the consenting shareholder.

For purposes of this section, a written consent and the signing thereof may be accomplished by one or more electronic transmissions.

Any person, whether or not then a shareholder, may provide that a consent in writing as a shareholder shall be effective at a future time, including the time when an event occurs, but such future time shall not be more than 60 days after such provision is made. Any such consent shall be deemed to have been made for purposes of this section at the future time so specified for the consent to be effective, provided that (i) the person is a shareholder at such future time and (ii) the person did not revoke the consent prior to such future time. Any such consent may be revoked, in the manner provided in subsection D, prior to its becoming effective.

If this chapter requires that notice of a proposed action be given to nonvoting shareholders and the action is to be taken by written consent of the voting shareholders, the corporation shall give its nonvoting shareholders written notice of the action not more than 10 days after (i) written consents sufficient to take the action have been delivered to the corporation’s secretary, or (ii) such later date that tabulation of consents is completed pursuant to an authorization under subsection E. The notice shall reasonably describe the action taken and contain or be accompanied by the same material that, under any provision of this chapter, would have been required to be sent to nonvoting shareholders in a notice of a meeting at which the proposed action would have been submitted to the shareholders for action.

If action is taken by less than unanimous written consent of the voting shareholders, the corporation shall give its nonconsenting voting shareholders written notice of the action not more than 10 days after (i) written consents sufficient to take the action have been delivered to the corporation’s secretary or (ii) such later date that tabulation of consents is completed pursuant to an authorization under subsection E. The notice shall reasonably describe the action taken and contain or be accompanied by the same material, that under any provision of this chapter, would have been required to be sent to voting shareholders in a notice of a meeting at which the action would have been submitted to the shareholders for action.

The notice requirements in subsections H and I shall not delay the effectiveness of actions taken by written consent, and a failure to comply with such notice requirements shall not invalidate actions taken by written consent, provided that this subsection shall not be deemed to limit judicial power to fashion any appropriate remedy in favor of a shareholder adversely affected by a failure to give such notice within the required time period.

History.

Code 1950, § 13.1-28; 1956, c. 428; 1985, c. 522; 1999, c. 416; 2003, c. 728; 2005, c. 765; 2007, c. 165; 2008, c. 91; 2010, c. 782; 2012, c. 706; 2015, c. 611; 2018, cc. 267, 308; 2019, c. 734; 2020, c. 1226.

Editor’s note.

Acts 2020, c. 1226, cl. 3 provides: “That the provisions of the first and second enactments of this act shall become effective July 1, 2021.”

The 1999 amendment,

in subsection A, designated the first sentence as subdivision A 1 and in subdivision A 1, substituted “prior notice” for “action by the board of directors,” and inserted “in which case no action by the board of directors shall be required,” added subdivision A 2, designated the second through the fourth sentences as subdivision A 3, and in subdivision A 3, substituted “the shareholders entitled to take such action without a meeting” for “all the shareholders entitled to vote on the action” in the first sentence, in the second sentence, deleted “unanimous” preceding “written consent,” and substituted “the requisite consents” for “all consents,” and substituted “the requisite consents” for “all consents” in the third sentence; in subsection C, deleted “unanimous” preceding “vote of voting,” and inserted “at a meeting” following “shareholders,” added subsections D and E, redesignated former subsection D as subsection F and in subsection F, in the first sentence, deleted “unanimous” preceding “consent of” and substituted “action not less than five” for “proposed action at least ten,” and deleted “proposed” preceding “action would” in the second sentence.

The 2003 amendments.

The 2003 amendment by c. 728 deleted former subsection E, defining “Public corporation” and redesignated former subsection F as present subsection E.

The 2005 amendments.

The 2005 amendment by c. 765 substituted “corporate action” for “action” throughout; substituted “this chapter” for “this Act” in subdivisions A 1, A 2 and subsection E, inserted “of this subsection” in subdivision A 2, in subdivision A 3, inserted “bearing the date of execution and” in the first sentence, deleted the former third sentence, which read: “A shareholder may withdraw consent only by delivering a written notice of withdrawal to the corporation prior to the time that the requisite consents are in the possession of the corporation”; rewrote subsection B; inserted the first sentence in subsection C; in subsection D, substituted “before it” for “before the action” in the first sentence and substituted “a vote” for “action” at the end of the second sentence; and in subsection E, inserted “proposed corporate” and substituted “before it” for “before the action” in the first sentence, and substituted “a vote” for “action” at the end of the second sentence.

The 2007 amendments.

The 2007 amendment by c. 165 rewrote the section.

The 2008 amendments.

The 2008 amendment by c. 91 inserted “adopted or” preceding “taken” and “adopt or” preceding “take” and deleted “corporate” preceding “action” throughout the section; inserted “adoption or taking of the” near the beginning of the second sentence of subsection A; deleted “corporate” preceding “action” in the third sentence of subsection C; rewrote subsection D; and deleted “not less than 15 days before the action becomes effective” following “written notice of the action” in the first sentence of subsections E and F.

The 2010 amendments.

The 2010 amendment by c. 782 deleted subsections G and H, which read: “G. An electronic transmission may be used to consent to an action, if the electronic transmission contains or is accompanied by information from which the corporation can determine the date on which the electronic transmission was signed and that the electronic transmission was authorized by the shareholder, the shareholder’s agent or the shareholder’s attorney-in-fact. “H. Delivery of a written consent to the corporation under this section is effected by delivery to the corporation’s registered agent at its registered office or to the secretary of the corporation at its principal office.”

The 2012 amendments.

The 2012 amendment by c. 706 rewrote subsection B.

The 2015 amendments.

The 2015 amendment by c. 611 substituted “shareholders”’ for “shareholder’s”; added subsection E; and redesignated former subsections E and F as subsections F and G.

The 2018 amendments.

The 2018 amendments by cc. 267 and 308 are nearly identical, and in subsection B, substituted “however, unless the articles of incorporation of a public corporation authorized action by shareholders by less than unanimous written consent as of April 1, 2018, the shareholders of the public corporation shall not be entitled to act by less than unanimous written consent even if so authorized by the articles of incorporation if the articles of incorporation or bylaws of such public corporation allow the holders of 30 percent or fewer of all votes entitled be cast to demand the calling of a special meeting of shareholders. For action by shareholders by less than unanimous written consent” for “For such action”; and in subdivision B 2, inserted “and in addition to the other limitations in this subsection B.” Subsection B has been set out in the form above at the direction of the Virginia Code Commission.

The 2019 amendments.

The 2019 amendment by c. 734 deleted “adopted or” preceding “taken” throughout; in subsection A, deleted “adoption or the taking of the” preceding “action shall be,” inserted “bearing the date of signature and” deleted “bearing the date of each signature” preceding “and deleted,” and substituted “the corporation’s secretary for filing by the corporation with the minutes of the meeting or corporate” for “the corporation for inclusion in the minutes or filing with the corporate”; in subsection B, deleted “corporation’s” preceding “articles of” throughout; in subdivision B 3, inserted “At least 10 days” at the beginning, and substituted “signed” for “executed”; added subdivision B 4; redesignated the former second paragraph of subdivision B 5 as subsection C; in subsections C, D, and E, substituted “corporation’s secretary” for “corporation” throughout; in subsection D, substituted “action by the board of directors” for “board action,” substituted “action of the board is taken” for “resolution of the board taking such prior action is adopted,” substituted “in such consent” for “therein,” and inserted “corporate” preceding “action” twice; in subsection E, inserted “taken” following “a vote”; inserted subsection F; in subsection H and I, substituted “corporation’s secretary” for “corporation” throughout; added subsection J; and made stylistic changes.

The 2020 amendments.

The 2020 amendment by c. 1226, effective July 1, 2021, substituted “or” for “and” at the end of subdivision B 2 a.

Law Review.

For a review of corporate law in Virginia for year 1999, see 33 U. Rich. L. Rev. 841 (1999).

For 2007 annual survey article, “Corporate and Business Law,” see 42 U. Rich. L. Rev. 273 (2007).

For annual survey article, “Corporate and Business Law,” see 44 U. Rich. L. Rev. 307 (2009).

For survey article, “Corporate and Business Law,” see 48 U. Rich. L. Rev. 39 (2013).

CIRCUIT COURT OPINIONS

Stock purchase agreement that one shareholder did not sign held void. —

Stock purchase agreement (SPA) was void for failing to comply with subdivision B 1 b of §

13.1-671.1

, since it was not signed by all the stockholders. That a majority shareholder signed, as an individual, a consent containing a resolution authorizing him as president of the corporation to sign agreements necessary to sell its stock of the company did not make his signature as president on the SPA his de facto individual signature. Booker v. Humphreys, 73 Va. Cir. 543, 2007 Va. Cir. LEXIS 12 (Lancaster County Jan. 19, 2007).

§ 13.1-658.
Notice of meeting.

Except as otherwise provided in subsection F, a corporation shall notify shareholders of the date, time, and place, if any, of each annual and special shareholders’ meeting no fewer than 10 nor more than 60 days before the meeting date except that notice of a shareholders’ meeting to act on an amendment of the articles of incorporation, a plan of merger, share exchange, domestication, or conversion, a proposed sale of assets pursuant to §

13.1-724

, or the dissolution of the corporation shall be given not fewer than 25 nor more than 60 days before the meeting date. If the board of directors has authorized participation by means of remote communication pursuant to §

13.1-660.2

for holders of any class or series of shares, the notice to the holders of such class or series of shares shall describe the means of remote communication to be used. The notice shall include the record date for determining the shareholders entitled to vote at the meeting, if such date is different from the record date for determining shareholders entitled to notice of the meeting. Unless this chapter or the articles of incorporation require otherwise, the corporation is required to give notice only to shareholders entitled to vote at the meeting as of the record date for determining the shareholders entitled to notice of the meeting.

Unless the articles of incorporation or this chapter requires otherwise, notice of an annual meeting of shareholders need not state the purpose or purposes for which the meeting is called.

Notice of a special meeting of shareholders shall state the purpose or purposes for which the meeting is called.

If not otherwise fixed under §

13.1-656

or

13.1-660

, the record date for determining shareholders entitled to notice of and to vote at an annual or special shareholders’ meeting is the day before the first notice is delivered to shareholders.

Unless the bylaws require otherwise, if an annual or special shareholders’ meeting is adjourned to a different date, time, or place, notice need not be given of the new date, time, or place if the new date, time, or place, if any, is announced at the meeting before adjournment. If a new record date for the adjourned meeting is or shall be fixed under §

13.1-660

, however, notice of the adjourned meeting shall be given not fewer than 10 days before the meeting date to shareholders entitled to vote at such adjourned meeting as of the record date fixed for notice of such adjourned meeting.

History.

Code 1950, § 13.1-26; 1956, c. 428; 1958, c. 564; 1975, c. 500; 1984, c. 301; 1985, c. 522; 1999, c. 102; 2001, c. 545; 2002, cc. 1, 285; 2005, c. 765; 2010, c. 782; 2015, c. 611; 2017, c. 646; 2019, c. 734; 2021, Sp. Sess. I, c. 487.

Editor’s note.

Acts 2019, c. 734, cl. 4, as amended by Acts 2020, c. 1226, cl. 5 provides: “That until July 1, 2021, the term ‘conversion,’ when used in any provision of the first enactment of this act, shall be construed to mean ‘entity conversion.’ ”

Acts 2021, Sp. Sess. I, c. 487, cl. 4 provides: “That the provisions of this act (i) shall be applied prospectively only; (ii) shall not affect the validity of any filing made, or other action taken, prior to July 1, 2021, with respect to the name of a stock corporation, nonstock corporation, limited liability company, business trust, or limited partnership; and (iii) shall not be construed to require any such stock corporation, nonstock corporation, limited liability company, business trust, or limited partnership that was in compliance with applicable laws regarding the distinguishability of its name prior to July 1, 2021, to change its name or take other action to comply with the requirements of this act.”

The 1999 amendment

added subsection G.

The 2001 amendments.

The 2001 amendment by c. 545, effective February 1, 2002, deleted “or” following “a plan of merger” and inserted “domestication or entity conversion” in subsection A. See Editor’s note.

The 2002 amendments.

The 2002 amendment by c. 285 repealed subsection G, which formerly read: “A corporation having 300 or more record shareholders may notify shareholders of annual and special shareholders’ meetings under this section by electronic transmission upon receipt by the secretary of the corporation of (i) a writing signed by the shareholder or (ii) a transmission of a telegram, cablegram or other means of electronic transmission from the shareholder, provided that any such telegram, cablegram or other means of electronic transmission must either set forth or be submitted with information from which the secretary can determine the telegram, cablegram or other means of electronic transmission was authorized by the shareholder, authorizing delivery of such notices by electronic transmission.”

The 2005 amendments.

The 2005 amendment by c. 765, in subsection B, substituted “the articles of incorporation or this chapter requires” for “this chapter or the articles of incorporation require”; in subsection D, deleted “the close of business on” following “meeting is”; in subsection F, substituted “the shareholder’s” for “his”; and made minor stylistic changes throughout the section.

The 2010 amendments.

The 2010 amendment by c. 782, in subsection A, added the third sentence and inserted “as of the record date for determining the shareholders entitled to notice of the meeting” in the last sentence; and substituted “shareholders entitled to vote at such adjourned meeting as of the record date fixed for notice of such adjourned meeting” for “persons who are shareholders as of the new record date” in subsection E.

The 2015 amendments.

The 2015 amendment by c. 611 inserted “not less than 10 days before the meeting date” in subsection E and substituted “shareholders”’ for “shareholder’s” in subsection F.

The 2017 amendments.

The 2017 amendment by c. 646 inserted “if any” in the first sentence of subsections A and D.

The 2019 amendments.

The 2019 amendment by c. 734, in subsection A, inserted “Except as otherwise provided in subsection F” at the beginning, substituted “meeting no fewer than” for “meeting. Such notice shall be given no less than,” deleted “entity” preceding “conversion,” substituted “fewer” for “less” preceding “than 25,” and inserted the second sentence; in subsections B and C, inserted “of shareholders” following “meeting”; in subsection D, inserted “shareholders”’ preceding “meeting,” and substituted “the first notice is delivered to” for “the effective date of the notice to”; in subsection E, inserted “shareholders”’ preceding “meeting is,” inserted “of the new date, time, or place” following “be given,” deleted “not less than 10 days before the meeting date” preceding “notice of,” and substituted “not fewer than 10 days before the meeting date” for “under this section”; and made stylistic changes.

The 2021 Sp. Sess. I amendments.

The 2021 amendment by Sp. Sess. I, c. 487, effective July 1, 2021, deleted subsection F, which read: “Notwithstanding the foregoing, no notice of a shareholders’ meeting need be given to a shareholder if (i) an annual report and proxy statements for two consecutive annual meetings of shareholders or (ii) all, and at least two, checks in payment of dividends or interest on securities during a 12-month period, have been sent by first-class United States mail, addressed to the shareholder at the shareholder’s address as it appears on the share transfer books of the corporation, and returned undeliverable. The obligation of the corporation to give notice of shareholders’ meetings to any such shareholder shall be reinstated once the corporation has received a new address for such shareholder for entry on its share transfer books.” For applicability clause, see Editor’s note.

Law Review.

For 2002 survey of Virginia technology law, see 37 U. Rich. L. Rev. 341 (2002).

§ 13.1-659.
Waiver of notice.

A shareholder may waive any notice required by this chapter, the articles of incorporation, or bylaws before or after the date and time stated in the notice. The waiver shall be in writing, be signed by the shareholder entitled to the notice, and be delivered to the corporation’s secretary for filing by the corporation with the minutes or corporate records.

A shareholder’s attendance at a meeting:

Waives objection to lack of notice or defective notice of the meeting, unless the shareholder at the beginning of the meeting objects to holding the meeting or transacting business at the meeting; and

Waives objection to consideration of a particular matter at the meeting that is not within the purpose or purposes described in the meeting notice, unless the shareholder objects to considering the matter when it is presented.

History.

Code 1950, § 13.1-27; 1956, c. 428; 1985, c. 522; 2019, c. 734.

The 2019 amendments.

The 2019 amendment by c. 734, in subsection A, substituted “stated in the” for “of the meeting that is the subject of such,” and substituted “the corporation’s secretary for filing by the corporation with the minutes or corporate” for “the secretary of the corporation for inclusion in the minutes or filing with the corporate.”

§ 13.1-660.
Record date for meeting.

The bylaws may fix or provide the manner of fixing in advance the record date or dates for one or more voting groups to determine the shareholders entitled to notice of a shareholders’ meeting, to demand a special meeting, to vote or take action by written consent, or to take any other action. If the bylaws do not fix or provide the manner of fixing a record date, the board of directors may fix in advance the record date or dates.

A record date fixed under this section may not be more than 70 days before the meeting or action requiring a determination of shareholders.

A determination of shareholders entitled to notice of or to vote at a shareholders’ meeting is effective for any adjournment of the meeting unless the board of directors fixes a new record date or dates, which it shall do if the meeting is adjourned to a date more than 120 days after the date fixed for the original meeting.

If a court orders a meeting adjourned to a date more than 120 days after the date fixed for the original meeting, it may provide that the original record date or dates continue in effect or it may fix a new record date or dates.

The record dates for a shareholders’ meeting fixed by or in the manner provided in the bylaws or by the board of directors shall be the record date for determining shareholders entitled both to notice of and to vote at the shareholders’ meeting, unless in the case of a record date fixed by the board of directors and to the extent not prohibited by the bylaws, the board of directors, at the time it fixes the record date for shareholders entitled to notice of the meeting, fixes a later record date on or before the date of the meeting to determine the shareholders entitled to vote at the meeting.

History.

Code 1950, §§ 13-192, 13.1-29; 1952, c. 88; 1956, c. 428; 1985, c. 522; 2005, c. 765; 2010, c. 782; 2019, c. 734.

The 2005 amendments.

The 2005 amendment by c. 765 deleted “a future date” following “may fix” and added “the date on which it takes such action or a future date” in the second sentence of subsection A; and substituted “70 days” for “seventy days” in subsection B.

The 2010 amendments.

The 2010 amendment by c. 782 inserted “or dates” in subsections A and C; substituted “or dates continue” for “continues” in subsection D; and added subsection E.

The 2019 amendments.

The 2019 amendment by c. 734 rewrote subsection A, which read: “The bylaws may fix or provide the manner of fixing in advance the record date or dates for one or more voting groups in order to make a determination of shareholders for any purpose. If the bylaws do not fix or provide for fixing a record date, the board of directors of the corporation may fix as the record date the date on which it takes such action or a future date”; in subsection E, inserted “of directors” following “the board”; and made a stylistic change.

§ 13.1-660.1.
Conduct of the meeting.

At each meeting of shareholders, a chairman shall preside. The chairman shall be appointed as provided in the articles of incorporation, bylaws, or, in the absence of such provision, by the board of directors.

Unless the articles of incorporation or bylaws provide otherwise, the chairman shall determine the order of business and shall have the authority to establish rules for the conduct of the meeting.

The chairman of the meeting shall announce at the meeting when the polls open and close for each matter voted upon. If no announcement is made, the polls shall be deemed to have opened at the beginning of the meeting and closed upon the final adjournment of the meeting.

History.

2005, c. 765; 2019, c. 734.

The 2019 amendments.

The 2019 amendment by c. 734 substituted “bylaws, or, in the absence of such provision” for “bylaws or, in the absence of such a provision” in subsection A.